lexc/noun/enhufnspec.lexc
LEXICON Possszerette
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famszerette;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famszerette;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famszerette;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famszerette;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famszerette;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famszerette;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famszerette;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famszerette;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famszerette;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famszerette;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszerette;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famszerette;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famszerette;

LEXICON Plurszerette
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genszerette;
                            Genszerette;
        
LEXICON Famszerette
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszerette;
                       Genszerette;

LEXICON Genszerette
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseszerette;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszerette;
                       Caseszerette;
 
LEXICON Caseszerette
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounszeretteae
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possszeretteae;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurszerette;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famszerette;

LEXICON Possszeretteae
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famszerette;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famszerette;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famszerette;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famszerette;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famszerette;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famszerette;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famszerette;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famszerette;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famszerette;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famszerette;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszerette;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famszerette;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Famszerette;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Famszerette;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famszerette;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famszerette;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famszerette;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famszerette;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszerette;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famszerette;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                         Famszerette;

LEXICON Noun
félholta:félholt AddNounszeretteae;
